Tennessee, session 114, SB0992.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 16-3-803(h), is amended by deleting
the language "circuit and juvenile courts" and substituting "and circuit courts".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 16-3-822, is amended by adding the
following language as a new subsection (b) and redesignating the subsequent subsection
accordingly:
(b) Pursuant to the requirements of § 37-1-187, the AOC must maintain a
criminal justice information services (CJIS) compliant centralized statewide juvenile case
management system that will be integrated into the system developed pursuant to
subsection (a). The juvenile case management system must be made available to all
juvenile court clerks, and the clerks must adopt and convert to the new system on a
schedule to be determined in consultation with the AOC.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 18-1-105, is amended by adding the
following language as a new subdivision (d)(3) and renumbering the subsequent subdivisions
accordingly:
(3) Each juvenile court and juvenile court clerk shall use the statewide juvenile
case management system designated by the AOC pursuant to § 16-3-822(b).
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-1-187, is amended by deleting
subsection (d) and substituting:
SB0992
001025
- 1 -

(d) Each juvenile court, through the juvenile court clerk or juvenile court staff,
shall, each month, within the statewide juvenile case management system prescribed by
the administrative office of the courts, report to the administrative office of the courts the
following information:
SECTION 5. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 001025